Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 30 Reports on Veterans Exposed to Agent Orange

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 31-30-9 provides that this chapter shall become effective when and to the extent that funds are appropriated and available to the Department of Human Resources (now Department of Community Health) under an appropriation which specifically refers to this chapter and provides that it is intended for the implementation of this chapter.
Funds were not appropriated at the 1983, 1984, 1985, 1986, 1987, 1988, 1989, 1990, 1991, 1992, 1993, 1994, 1995, 1996, 1997, 1998, 1999, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, or 2022 sessions of the General Assembly.

Cross references.

Veterans affairs, T. 38, C. 4.

31-30-1.
[For effective date, see note.] Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Agent Orange” means the herbicide composed primarily of trichlorophenoxyacetic acid and dichlorophenoxyacetic acid.

“Veteran” means a person who was a resident of this state at the time of his induction into the armed forces of the United States of America or was a resident of this state on or after November 1, 1982, and who served in Vietnam, Cambodia, or Laos during the Vietnam Conflict.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-30-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2321, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the delayed effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

31-30-2.
[For effective date, see note.] Submission of report to department.

A physician who has primary responsibility for treating a veteran who believes he may have been exposed to chemical defoliants or herbicides or other causative agents, including but not limited to Agent Orange, while serving in the armed forces of the United States shall, at the request of the veteran, submit a report to the department on a form provided by the department. If there is no physician having primary responsibility for treating the veteran, the hospital treating the veteran shall, at the request of the veteran, submit the report to the department.

The form provided by the department to the physician shall request the following information:

Symptoms of the veteran which may be related to exposure to a chemical defoliant or herbicide or other causative agent, including Agent Orange;

Diagnosis of the veteran; and

Methods of treatment prescribed.

The department may require the veteran to provide such other information as determined by the commissioner.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-30-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2321, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the delayed effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

31-30-3.
[For effective date, see note.] Report by department of information submitted under chapter; conduct of epidemiological studies by department.

The department, in consultation and cooperation with a board certified medical toxicologist, shall compile and evaluate information submitted under this chapter into a report to be distributed annually to members of the General Assembly and to the United States Department of Veterans Affairs and the Georgia Department of Veterans Service. The report shall contain current research findings on the effects of exposure to chemical defoliants or herbicides or other causative agents, including Agent Orange, and statistical information compiled from reports submitted by physicians or hospitals.

The department, in consultation and cooperation with a board certified medical toxicologist, shall conduct epidemiological studies on veterans who have cancer or other medical problems associated with exposure to a chemical defoliant or herbicide or any other causative agent, including Agent Orange, or who have children born with birth defects after the veterans’ suspected exposure to a chemical defoliant or herbicide or any other causative agent, including Agent Orange. The department must obtain consent from each veteran to be studied under this subsection. The department shall compile and evaluate information obtained from these studies into a report to be distributed as provided by subsection (a) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-30-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2321, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 45, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the delayed effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

31-30-4.
[For effective date, see note.] Disclosure of identity of subject of report; statistics as public information.

The identity of a veteran about whom a report has been made under Code Section 31-30-2 or 31-30-3 may not be disclosed unless the veteran consents to the disclosure. Statistical information collected under this chapter is public information.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-30-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2321, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the delayed effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

31-30-5.
[For effective date, see note.] Immunity of physician or hospital providing required information.

A physician or a hospital subject to this chapter who complies with this chapter may not be held civilly or criminally liable for providing the information required by this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-30-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2321, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the delayed effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

31-30-6.
[For effective date, see note] Actions for release of information and individual medical records.

The Attorney General may represent a class of individuals composed of veterans who may have been injured because of contact with chemical defoliants or herbicides or other causative agents, including Agent Orange, in an action for release of information relating to exposure to such chemicals during military service and for release of individual medical records.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-30-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2321, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the delayed effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

31-30-7.
[For effective date, see note.] Referral of veterans for medical and financial assistance; screening services to ascertain physical damage from exposure.

The department and the health science centers and other medical facilities of the University System of Georgia shall institute a cooperative program to:

Refer veterans to appropriate state and federal agencies for the purpose of filing claims to remedy medical and financial problems caused by the veterans’ exposure to chemical defoliants or herbicides or other causative agents, including Agent Orange; and

Provide veterans with fat tissue biopsies, genetic counseling, and genetic screening to determine if the veteran has suffered physical damage as a result of substantial exposure to chemical defoliants or herbicides or other causative agents, including Agent Orange.

The commissioner shall adopt rules necessary to the administration of the programs authorized by this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-30-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2321, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the delayed effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

31-30-8.
[For effective date, see note.] Discontinuance of referral and screening programs performed by federal government.

If the commissioner determines that an agency of the federal government is performing the referral and screening functions required by Code Section 31-30-7, the commissioner may discontinue any program required by this chapter or any duty required of a physician or hospital under this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-30-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2321, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the delayed effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

31-30-9.
[For effective date, see note.] When chapter effective.

This chapter shall become effective when and to the extent that funds are appropriated and available to the Department of Public Health under an appropriation which specifically refers to this chapter and provides that it is intended for the implementation of this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-30-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2321, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Editor’s notes.

For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the delayed effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).